Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Juvenile Delinquency.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that the enactment of AS

47.12.020(b)

,

47.12.022

, and

47.12.025

and the 2005 amendments of AS

47.12.065

and

47.12.160

have the effect of amending specific Alaska Delinquency Rules to conform those court rules to the statutory changes to acknowledge the inclusion of certain persons 18 years of age or older as minors under this chapter and to acknowledge the special statutory provisions contained in the enacted and amended sections to those persons.
For a list of the specific court rules affected, see § 10, ch. 70, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.12.010.
Goal and purposes of chapter.

The goal of this chapter is to promote a balanced juvenile justice system in the state to protect the community, impose accountability for violations of law, and equip juvenile offenders with the skills needed to live responsibly and productively.

The purposes of this chapter are to

respond to a juvenile offender’s needs in a manner that is consistent with

prevention of repeated criminal behavior;

restoration of the community and victim;

protection of the public; and

development of the juvenile into a productive citizen;

protect citizens from juvenile crime;

hold each juvenile offender directly accountable for the offender’s conduct;

provide swift and consistent consequences for crimes committed by juveniles;

make the juvenile justice system more open, accessible, and accountable to the public;

require parental or guardian participation in the juvenile justice process;

create an expectation that parents will be held responsible for the conduct and needs of their children;

ensure that victims, witnesses, parents, foster parents, guardians, juvenile offenders, and all other interested parties are treated with dignity, respect, courtesy, and sensitivity throughout all legal proceedings;

provide due process through which juvenile offenders, victims, parents, and guardians are assured fair legal proceedings during which constitutional and other legal rights are recognized and enforced;

divert juveniles from the formal juvenile justice process through early intervention as warranted when consistent with the protection of the public;

provide an early, individualized assessment and action plan for each juvenile offender in order to prevent further criminal behavior through the development of appropriate skills in the juvenile offender so that the juvenile is more capable of living productively and responsibly in the community;

ensure that victims and witnesses of crimes committed by juveniles are afforded the same rights as victims and witnesses of crimes committed by adults;

encourage and provide opportunities for local communities and groups to play an active role in the juvenile justice process in ways that are culturally relevant; and

review and evaluate regularly and independently the effectiveness of programs and services under this chapter.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1999)

Sec. 47.12.020.
Jurisdiction.

Proceedings relating to a minor under 18 years of age residing or found in the state are governed by this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when the minor is alleged to be or may be determined by a court to be a delinquent minor as a result of violating a criminal law of the state or a municipality of the state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, proceedings relating to a person who is 18 years of age or over are governed by this chapter if the person is alleged to have committed a violation of the criminal law of the state or a municipality of the state, the violation occurred when the person was under 18 years of age, and the period of limitation under AS 12.10 has not expired.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the detention and care of a person who is alleged to have committed a violation of a criminal law of the state or local government, subject to the provisions of AS

47.12.030(a)

,

47.12.100

, and

47.12.105

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2005; am § 19 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added subsection (b).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, added (c).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that (b) of this section “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 47.12.022.
Applicability; inclusion of certain persons as minors.

Except as provided in AS

47.12.025

, the provisions of this chapter apply to a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter due to AS

47.12.020(b)

or (c). To implement AS

47.12.020(b)

and (c) and this section, the term “minor” as used in this chapter includes a person described in this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 2005; am § 20 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that this section “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, deleted “solely” following “chapter due”, and twice inserted “or (c)” following “AS

47.12.020(b)

.”

Sec. 47.12.025.
Special provisions for certain persons considered to be minors.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following special provisions apply to a person who is subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter due solely to AS

47.12.020(b)

:

a petition filed under AS

47.12.040(b)

must be styled as follows: “In the matter of . . . . . . . . , a person under the jurisdiction of this chapter under AS

47.12.020(b)

”; the petition may not state the name of a parent, guardian, or other person;

notice of an investigation, adjustment, hearing, or other procedure under this chapter to a parent, guardian, or foster parent is not required;

participation by a parent, guardian, or foster parent in any part of the investigation, adjustment, hearing, or other procedure under this chapter is not required;

agreement or consent by a parent or guardian to the terms and conditions of an informal adjustment under AS

47.12.060

is not required;

an opportunity for a foster parent to be heard before informal adjustment under AS

47.12.060

is not required;

the presence of a parent or guardian is not required, and the person does not have a right to have a parent or guardian present, at an interview conducted during an investigation under this chapter;

after a petition is filed and after further investigation that the court directs, if the person has not appeared voluntarily for proceedings under this chapter, the court may issue a summons or an arrest warrant for the person;

a person who is taken into custody under this chapter may, in the discretion of the court and upon written promise to appear in court at the time specified by the court, be released; if not released, the person shall be detained under the provisions of (b) of this section;

consent of a parent or guardian to waiver of the right to appointed counsel or a guardian ad litem under AS

47.12.090

is not required;

the appointment of a guardian ad litem under AS

47.12.090

is not required; the court may appoint a guardian ad litem under AS 47.12.090 only if special circumstances exist concerning the mental or physical capacity of the person who is named in the petition under (1) of this subsection;

an order under AS

47.12.120(b)

to release the person to a parent, guardian, or other person must be with the consent of the parent, guardian, or other person; a parent, guardian, or other person who consents does not assume any of the responsibilities described in AS

47.12.150

or retain any residual rights or responsibilities described in AS

47.12.150

;

a person released under AS

47.12.120(c)

shall be released without conditions;

a parent, guardian, or custodian may not apply for a review under AS

47.12.120(d)

; notice to a parent, guardian, custodian, or foster parent of a review under AS

47.12.120(a)

is not required; a parent, guardian, custodian, or foster parent does not have a right to be heard at the review under AS

47.12.120(d)

;

the person’s parent or guardian may not file an appeal under AS

47.12.120(f)

;

notice of the predisposition report under AS

47.12.130(b)

to the person’s parent or guardian is not required;

unless part of a conditional release plan agreed to by a parent or guardian, a parent or guardian of the person may not be ordered to participate in or pay for treatment under AS

47.12.155(b)(1)

, (c), or (d) or to notify the department if the person violates a term or condition of a court order under AS

47.12.155(b)(2)

;

an application to extend jurisdiction under AS

47.12.160(a)

may not be made by a parent or guardian;

the court may not order the parent of the person to pay for maintenance or care of the person under AS

47.12.230

;

the name of a parent or guardian of the person is not required to be disclosed in connection with the filing of a petition or informal adjustment under AS

47.12.315

.

At a hearing under AS

47.12.250(c)

regarding a person who is subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter due solely to AS

47.12.020(b)

, if the court finds that probable cause exists, the court shall determine whether the person should be detained pending the hearing on the petition or released. The court may either order the person detained as provided in (c) of this section or released under the provisions of AS 12.30 as if the provisions of AS 12.30 were to apply to proceedings under this chapter. If the court finds no probable cause, the court shall order the person released and close the proceeding.

If a person who is subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter due solely to AS

47.12.020(b)

has been arrested by a peace officer or a juvenile probation officer under AS

47.12.245

, detained under AS

47.12.250

, or committed to the custody or supervision of the department under AS

47.12.120(b)

or

47.12.240

, the department, after consulting the peace officer or juvenile probation officer if appropriate, shall make arrangements for the detention, placement, or supervision of the person. In the discretion of the department, the person may be detained or placed in a juvenile detention facility, juvenile treatment facility, temporary secure juvenile holding area, or adult correctional facility.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 2005; am § 21 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (c), in the first sentence, twice inserted “juvenile” preceding “probation officer”, in the second sentence, substituted “juvenile detention facility, juvenile treatment facility, temporary secure juvenile holding area, or adult correctional facility” for “juvenile facility or in an adult correctional facility.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that this section “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 47.12.030.
Provisions inapplicable.

When a minor who was at least 16 years of age at the time of the offense is charged by complaint, information, or indictment with an offense specified in this subsection, this chapter and the Alaska Delinquency Rules do not apply to the offense for which the minor is charged or to any additional offenses joinable to it under the applicable rules of court governing criminal procedure. Subject to the provisions of AS

47.12.105

, the minor shall be charged, held, transported, released on bail, prosecuted, sentenced, and incarcerated in the same manner as an adult. If the minor is convicted of an offense other than an offense specified in this subsection, the minor may attempt to prove, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the minor is amenable to treatment under this chapter. If the court finds that the minor is amenable to treatment under this chapter, the minor shall be treated as though the charges had been heard under this chapter, and the court shall order disposition of the charges of which the minor is convicted under AS

47.12.120(b)

. The provisions of this subsection apply when the minor is charged by complaint, information, or indictment with an offense

that is an unclassified felony or a class A felony and the felony is a crime against a person;

of arson in the first degree;

that is a class B felony and the felony is a crime against a person in which the minor is alleged to have used a deadly weapon in the commission of the offense and the minor was previously adjudicated as a delinquent or convicted as an adult, in this or another jurisdiction, as a result of an offense that involved use of a deadly weapon in the commission of a crime against a person or an offense in another jurisdiction having elements substantially identical to those of a crime against a person, and the previous offense was punishable as a felony; in this paragraph, “deadly weapon” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

; or

that is misconduct involving weapons in the first degree under

AS

11.61.190(a)(1)

; or

AS

11.61.190(a)(2)

when the firearm was discharged under circumstances manifesting substantial and unjustifiable risk of physical injury to a person.

When a minor is accused of violating a statute specified in this subsection, other than a statute the violation of which is a felony, this chapter and the Alaska Delinquency Rules do not apply and the minor accused of the offense shall be charged, prosecuted, and sentenced in the district court in the same manner as an adult; if a minor is charged, prosecuted, and sentenced for an offense under this subsection, the minor’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall be present at all proceedings; the provisions of this subsection apply when a minor is accused of violating

a traffic statute or regulation, or a traffic ordinance or regulation of a municipality;

AS

11.76.105

, relating to the possession of tobacco by a person under 19 years of age;

a fish and game statute or regulation under AS 16;

a parks and recreational facilities statute or regulation under AS 41.21;

[Repealed, § 23 ch 16 SLA 2021.]

a municipal curfew ordinance, whether adopted under AS

29.35.085

or otherwise, unless the municipality provides for enforcement of its ordinance under AS

29.25.070(b)

by the municipality; in place of any fine imposed for the violation of a municipal curfew ordinance, the court shall allow a defendant the option of performing community work; the value of the community work, which may not be lower than the amount of the fine, shall be determined under AS

12.55.055(c)

; in this paragraph, “community work” includes the work described in AS

12.55.055(b)

or work that, on the recommendation of the municipal or borough assembly, city council, or traditional village council of the defendant’s place of residence, would benefit persons within the municipality or village who are elderly or disabled;

AS

04.16.050

, relating to consumption, possession, or control of alcohol by a person under 21 years of age.

The provisions of AS

47.12.010

—

47.12.260

and the Alaska Delinquency Rules do not apply to driver’s license proceedings under AS

28.15.185

; the court shall impose a driver’s license revocation under AS

28.15.185

in the same manner as adult driver’s license revocations, except that a parent or legal guardian shall be present at all proceedings.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 2005; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016; am §§ 22, 23 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added paragraph (a)(4) and made related stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, repealed (b)(5).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “Subject to the provisions of AS

47.12.105

, the minor shall be charged, held, transported” for “The minor shall be charged, held,”; added (b)(7), and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to subsection (a), made in § 16, ch. 107, SLA 1998, apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998. Also, § 2, ch. 9, 1998 provides that paragraph (a)(3), added by § 1, ch. 9, SLA 1998, applies to offenses committed on or after July 7, 1998, but that references in (a)(3) to previous adjudications or convictions include offenses committed on, before, or after July 7, 1998.

Section 5, ch. 66, SLA 2005, provides that (a)(4) of this section “applies to acts committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Section 57(a),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (b) of this section applies to “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 66, SLA 2005 (HB 88), relating to weapons offenses involving minors, see 2005 House Journal 104 — 106.

Sec. 47.12.040.
Investigation and petition.

Whenever circumstances subject a minor to the jurisdiction of this chapter, the court shall

require in conformance with this section, that, for a minor who is alleged to be a delinquent minor under AS

47.12.020

, the department or an entity selected by it shall make a preliminary inquiry to determine if any action is appropriate and may take appropriate action to adjust the matter without a court hearing; the department or an entity selected by it may arrange to interview the minor, the minor’s parents or guardian, and any other person having relevant information; at or before the interview, the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian, if present, must be advised that any statement may be used against the minor and of the following rights of the minor: to have a parent or guardian present at the interview; to remain silent; to have retained or appointed counsel at all stages of the proceedings, including the initial interview; if a petition is filed, to have an adjudication hearing before a judge or jury with compulsory process to compel the attendance of witnesses; and the opportunity to confront and cross-examine witnesses; if, under this paragraph,

the department or an entity selected by it makes a preliminary inquiry and takes appropriate action to adjust the matter without a court hearing, the minor may not be detained or taken into custody as a condition of the adjustment and, subject to AS

47.12.060

, the matter shall be closed by the department or an entity selected by it if the minor successfully completes all that is required of the minor by the department or an entity selected by it in the adjustment; in a municipality or municipalities in which a youth court has been established under AS

47.12.400

, adjustment of the matter under this paragraph may include referral to the youth court; if a community dispute resolution center has been established under AS

47.12.450(a)

and has obtained recognition under AS

47.12.450(b)

, adjustment of the matter under this paragraph may include use of the services of the community dispute resolution center;

the department or an entity selected by it concludes that the matter may not be adjusted without a court hearing, the department may file a petition, amended petition, or supplemental petition under (2) of this subsection setting out the facts; or

appoint a competent person or agency to make a preliminary inquiry and report for the information of the court to determine whether the interests of the public or of the minor require that further action be taken; if, under this paragraph, the court appoints a person or agency to make a preliminary inquiry and to report to it, then upon the receipt of the report, the court may informally adjust the matter without a hearing, or it may authorize the person having knowledge of the facts of the case to file with the court a petition setting out the facts; if, following the filing of a petition, additional facts are determined, the court may authorize a person having knowledge of the facts to file an amended petition or supplemental petition; if the court informally adjusts the matter, the minor may not be detained or taken into the custody of the court as a condition of the adjustment, and the matter shall be closed by the court upon adjustment.

The petition and all subsequent pleadings shall be styled as follows: “In the matter of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., a minor under 18 years of age.” The petition may be executed upon the petitioner’s information and belief, and must be verified. It must include the following information:

the name, address, and occupation of the petitioner, together with the petitioner’s relationship to the minor, and the petitioner’s interest in the matter;

the name, age, and address of the minor;

a brief statement of the facts that bring the minor within this chapter;

the names and addresses of the minor’s parents;

the name and address of the minor’s guardian, or of the person having control or custody of the minor.

If the petitioner does not know a fact required in this section, the petitioner shall so state in the petition.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1998; am § 24 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For authority of court to order a minor to submit to a blood test when a petition has been filed alleging a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.450

that includes sexual penetration as an element of the offense, see AS

18.15.300

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a)(1)(B), inserted “, amended petition, or supplemental petition” following “file a petition”, and in (a)(2), inserted “if, following the filing of a petition, additional facts are determined, the court may authorize a person having knowledge of the facts to file an amended petition or supplemental petition;” following “petition setting out the facts;”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments made to subsection (a) by ch. 107, SLA 1998 apply “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”

Sec. 47.12.050.
Notice to and involvement of parent or guardian.

Except as may be otherwise specifically provided, in all cases under this chapter, the minor, each parent of the minor, the foster parent of the minor, and the guardian of the minor are entitled to notice adequate to give actual notice of the proceedings, taking into account education and language differences that are known or reasonably ascertainable by the party giving the notice. The notice must contain all names by which the minor has been identified.

Notice shall be given in the manner appropriate under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action under state law or in any manner the court by order directs. Proof of giving of the notice shall be filed with the court before the petition is heard or other proceeding commenced.

The court may subpoena the parent or guardian of the minor, or any other person whose testimony may be necessary at the hearing. A subpoena or other process may be served by a person authorized by law to make the service. If personal service cannot be made, the court may direct that service of process be in the manner appropriate under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action under state law or in any manner the court directs.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the presence of the minor’s parent or guardian is preferred.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For effect of the amendment made by § 2, ch. 40, SLA 1999 on the Alaska Delinquency Rules, see § 10, ch. 40, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 47.12.060.
Informal action to adjust matter.

The provisions of this section apply to a minor who is alleged to be a delinquent minor under AS

47.12.020

and for whom the department or an entity selected by it has made a preliminary inquiry as required by AS

47.12.040(a)(1)

. Following the preliminary inquiry,

the department or the entity selected by it may dismiss the matter with or without prejudice; or

the department or the entity selected by it may take informal action to adjust the matter.

When the department or the entity selected by it decides to make an informal adjustment of a matter under (a)(2) of this section, that informal adjustment

must be made with the agreement or consent of the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian to the terms and conditions of the adjustment;

must give the minor’s foster parent an opportunity to be heard before the informal adjustment is made;

must include notice that informal action to adjust a matter is not successfully completed unless, among other factors that the department or the entity selected by it considers, as to the victim of the act of the minor that is the basis of the delinquency allegation, the minor pays restitution in the amount set by the department or the entity selected by it or agrees as a term or condition set by the department or the entity selected by it to pay the restitution;

[Repealed, § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 56 ch 16 SLA 2021.]

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1999; am § 16 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 56 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For effect of the amendment made by § 3, ch. 40, SLA 1999 on the Alaska Delinquency Rules, see § 10, ch. 40, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, repealed (b)(4).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, repealed (b)(5).

Sec. 47.12.065.
Dual sentencing provisions.

The department or the entity selected by it may refer to the appropriate district attorney the circumstances involving a minor who is subject to the provisions of this section because the minor is alleged to have violated a criminal law of the state. Except as provided in (d) of this section, the department or the entity selected by it may make the referral if the minor was 16 years of age or older at the time of the offense, and the offense is

a felony that is a crime against a person and the minor has previously been adjudicated a delinquent under the laws of this state or substantially similar laws of another jurisdiction for a felony offense that is a crime against a person; or

sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree.

If a referral is made under (a) of this section, the district attorney may elect to seek imposition of a dual sentence in the case to further the goal and purposes of this chapter as set out in AS

47.12.010

. If the district attorney seeks imposition of a dual sentence, the district attorney shall present the case to the grand jury for indictment. If the grand jury returns an indictment, the district attorney shall file with the court under AS

47.12.040(a)

a petition seeking the minor’s adjudication as a delinquent.

If the district attorney decides not to seek imposition of a dual sentence under (b) of this section or if the grand jury does not return an indictment, the case shall proceed under the remaining provisions of this chapter.

The department or the entity selected by it may refer to the appropriate district attorney a person who is subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter under AS

47.12.020(b)

and who is alleged to have committed a felony or other offense. If the district attorney elects to seek imposition of a dual sentence in the matter, the district attorney shall file notice of that election. If the alleged crime is a misdemeanor, the district attorney shall file a delinquency petition. If the alleged crime is a felony, the district attorney shall follow the procedure set out in (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 107 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 70 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added “Except as provided in (d) of this section” at the beginning of the second sentence in subsection (a) and added subsection (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”

Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that (d) of this section “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 47.12.070.
Summons and custody of minor.

After a petition is filed and after further investigation that the court directs, if the minor has not appeared voluntarily, the court shall issue a summons that

recites briefly the substance of the petition;

directs the person having custody or control of the minor to appear personally in court with the minor at the place and at the time set forth in the summons.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.12.080.
Release of minor.

A minor who is taken into custody may, in the discretion of the court and upon the written promise of the parent, guardian, or custodian to bring the minor before the court at a time specified by the court, be released to the care and custody of the parent, guardian, or custodian. The minor, if not released, shall be detained as provided by AS

47.12.240

. The court may determine whether the father or mother or another person shall have the custody and control of the minor for the duration of the proceedings. If the minor is of sufficient age and intelligence to state desires, the court shall give consideration to the minor’s desires.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.12.090.
Appointment of attorney or guardian ad litem.

In all proceedings initiated under a petition for delinquency, a minor shall have the right to be represented by counsel and, if indigent, have counsel appointed by the court. The court shall appoint counsel in such cases unless it makes a finding on the record that the minor has made a voluntary, knowing, and intelligent waiver of the right to counsel and a parent or guardian with whom the minor resides or resided before the filing of the petition concurs with the waiver. In cases in which it has been alleged that the minor has committed an act that would be a felony if committed by an adult, waiver of counsel may not be accepted unless the court is satisfied that the minor has consulted with an attorney before the waiver of counsel.

Whenever in the course of proceedings instituted under this chapter it appears to the court that the welfare of a minor will be promoted by the appointment of an attorney to represent the minor or an attorney or other person to serve as guardian ad litem, the court may make the appointment. Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney shall be made under the terms of AS

25.24.310

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For appointment of counsel, see Delinquency Rule 16; for guardians ad litem, see Delinquency Rule 15.

Sec. 47.12.100.
Waiver of jurisdiction.

If the court finds at a hearing on a petition that there is probable cause for believing that a minor is delinquent and finds that the minor is not amenable to treatment under this chapter, it shall order the case closed. Subject to the provisions of AS

47.12.105

, after a case is closed under this subsection, the minor may be charged, held, transported, released on bail, prosecuted, sentenced, and incarcerated in the same manner as an adult.

A minor is unamenable to treatment under this chapter if the minor probably cannot be rehabilitated by treatment under this chapter before reaching 20 years of age. In determining whether a minor is unamenable to treatment, the court may consider the seriousness of the offense the minor is alleged to have committed, the minor’s history of delinquency, the probable cause of the minor’s delinquent behavior, and the facilities available to the department for treating the minor.

For purposes of making a determination under this section,

the standard of proof is by a preponderance of the evidence; and

the burden of proof that a minor is not amenable to treatment under this chapter is on the state; however, if the petition filed under AS

47.12.040

seeking to have the court declare a minor a delinquent is based on the minor’s alleged commission of an offense that is an unclassified felony or class A felony and that is a crime against a person, the minor

is rebuttably presumed not to be amenable to treatment under this chapter; and

has the burden of proof of showing that the minor is amenable to treatment under this chapter.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For court rule covering waiver proceedings, see Delinquency Rule 20.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, rewrote the second sentence of (a), which read, “After a case is closed under this subsection, the minor may be prosecuted as an adult.”

Sec. 47.12.105.
Detention of minors waived into adult court.

Except as provided in AS

47.12.240

, the department, by agreement with the Department of Corrections, shall detain and care for waived minors. The department shall transfer a waived minor to a facility operated by the Department of Corrections when the waived minor reaches 18 years of age.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a waived minor held in an adult correctional facility for more than four hours to attend court proceedings must be separated by sight and sound from adult offenders.

If there is not an available juvenile detention facility in a community where a trial is being held or if a juvenile facility is inappropriate for a waived minor, the department may request that the court order, in the interest of justice, that a waived minor be held in an adult correctional facility with or without sight and sound separation from adult offenders. In making this decision, the court shall consider

the age of the waived minor;

the physical and mental maturity of the waived minor;

the present mental state of the waived minor, including whether the waived minor presents an imminent risk of harm to self;

the nature and circumstances of the alleged offense;

the waived minor’s history of prior delinquent acts;

the relative ability of an available adult or juvenile detention facility to meet the specific needs of the waived minor and protect the safety of the public and other detained minors; and

other relevant factors.

If a court determines under (c) of this section that it is in the interest of justice to permit a waived minor to be held in an adult correctional facility,

the department shall request a hearing not less than once every 30 days to review the determination that the waived minor may be held under the ordered circumstances;

the waived minor may not be held in an adult correctional facility, or permitted to have sight or sound contact with adult offenders, for more than 180 days, unless the court determines in writing that there is good cause for an extension or the waived minor expressly waives this limitation.

A waived minor detained under (a) of this section shall be detained in a secure juvenile facility and receive credit, including a good time deduction under AS

33.20.010

, for time spent in a department facility pending trial, sentencing, or appeal, if the detention is in connection with an offense for which a sentence is imposed.

A waived minor who is detained in an adult correctional facility under (c) of this section is entitled to counsel at a review hearing held under (d) of this section.

In this section, “waived minor” means an individual who commits an offense while under the age of 18 and is waived into adult court under AS

47.12.030

or

47.12.100

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 60, ch. 16, SLA 2021, makes this section effective July 9, 2021, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.